Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-22,100
Violation; penalty.

Except as provided in section 54-2288, any person who violates the Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for the first offense and shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 34;

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 46;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2234;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 66.